Wisconsin, session 2025, AB307.
do enact as follows:AB307,14Section 1. 118.60 (2) (be) 1. a. of the statutes is repealed.AB307,25Section 2. 118.60 (2) (be) 1. c. of the statutes is amended to read:AB307,2,31118.60 (2) (be) 1. c. “Pupil participation limit” means a school district’s 2membership in the previous school year multiplied by the applicable percentage for 3the current school year 0.1.AB307,34Section 3. 118.60 (2) (be) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB307,2,105118.60 (2) (be) 2. Except as provided in subd. 2m., beginning with the 2015-16 6school year and ending with the 2025-26 school year, the total number of pupils 7residing in a school district, other than an eligible school district or a 1st class city 8school district, who may attend a private school under this section during a school 9year may not exceed the school district’s pupil participation limit for that school 10year.AB307,411Section 4. 118.60 (2) (be) 3. of the statutes is repealed.AB307,2,1212